District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.03

Authorized activities of title insurers.

Subject to the exceptions and restrictions contained in this chapter, a title insurer may do any of the following:

(1)

Engage in the business of writing title insurance directly or through title insurance producers appointed for the purpose of issuing policies of title insurance;

(2)

Reinsure title insurance policies;

(3)

Unless prohibited by the Commissioner, perform ancillary activities, including examining titles to real property and any interest in real or personal property and procuring and furnishing related information and information about relevant personal property, when not in contemplation of, or in conjunction with, the issuance of a title insurance policy; and

(4)

Maintain or perform escrow, indemnity, or settlement services.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2144, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2144 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).